Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.155

Unlawful use of firearm or deadly weapon—Arrest required.

The unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon by a person in, or adjacent to his or her dwelling, that imminently threatens the physical safety of other people in the adjacent area, so as to essentially interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of their residences, is a nuisance and may be abated, and the person who unlawfully used the firearm or deadly weapon is subject to the punishment provided in this chapter. This section does not apply unless the person who unlawfully used the firearm or other deadly weapon is arrested for this activity.

[ 1992 c 38 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1992 c 38: See notes following RCW 59.18.352.